Alaska, session 34, SB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 43.20.012 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (e) A corporation primarily operating in Port MacKenzie is exempt from the 06 tax imposed under this chapter. 07 * Sec. 2. AS 43.20.012(e) is repealed. 08 * Sec. 3. Section 1 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 09 * Sec. 4. Section 2 of this Act takes effect July 1, 2035. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.